Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Oregon Arts Commission .......... $ 4,085,556
(2) Business, innovation and
trade.......................................... $ 8,604,743
(3) Debt service .............................. $ 70,193,654
(4) Infrastructure ........................... $ 12,648,000
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 21,536,912
(2) Infrastructure ........................... $464,422,405
(3) Operations................................. $ 3,312,509
(4) Arts and Cultural Trust ........... $ 11,197,747
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Business, innovation
and trade...................................  $ 77,234,697
(2) Operations.................................  $ 9,655,570
(3) Oregon Film and Video Office .. $ 1,307,330
(4) Lottery bond debt service ......... $ 50,379,539
(5) Infrastructure ........................... $ 2,798,735
Enrolled House Bill 5023 (HB 5023-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Business Development
Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 28,256,787
(2) Infrastructure ........................... $ 54,808,506
(3) Operations................................. $ 250,176
(4) Arts ........................................... $ 2,119,144
SECTION 5. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, expenditures by the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department are not limited for:
(1) Loans from the following funds:
(a) Oregon Business Development  Fund (ORS 285B.092), Oregon Entrepreneurial Devel-
opment Loan  Fund (ORS 285B.758), Credit Enhancement Fund (ORS 285B.215) and Small
Business Expansion Loan Fund (ORS 285B.133).
(b) Special Public Works Fund (ORS 285B.455), Water Fund (ORS 285B.563), Marine  Nav-
igation Improvement Fund (ORS 777.267), Oregon Port Revolving Fund (ORS  285A.708), Safe
Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund  (ORS 285A.213) and Brownfields Redevelopment Fund
(ORS 285A.188).
(2) Debt service, excluding debt  service on lottery revenue bonds and general obligation
bonds.
SECTION 6.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5023 (HB 5023-A) Page 2